Washington statutes.
RCW 5.24.020

Manner of obtaining information.

The court may inform itself of such laws in such manner as it may deem proper, and the court may call upon counsel to aid it in obtaining such information.

[ 1941 c 82 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 1279.]